North Carolina statutes. Chapter 54B. Savings and Loan Associations.
Article 4. Supervision and Regulation.

§ 54B-52.
Commissioner of Banks.

The Commissioner of Banks of the State is hereby empowered and directed to perform all the duties and exercise all the powers as to savings and loan associations organized or operated under this Chapter, unless herein otherwise provided.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1989, c. 76, s. 16; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-53.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-193, s. 3, effective July 1, 2001.

§ 54B-54.
Deputy commissioner of Savings Institutions Division.

There shall be a deputy commissioner of the Savings Institutions Division as appointed by the Commissioner in

G.S. 53C-2-2

. The deputy commissioner authorized by this section shall perform any duties and exercise any powers directed by the Commissioner.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1989, c. 76, s. 18; 2001-193, s. 5; 2012-56, s. 40.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 40, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-2-2” for “G.S. 53-93.1(b).”

§ 54B-55.
Power of Commissioner of Banks to promulgate rules and regulations; reproduction of records.

The Commissioner of Banks shall have the right, and is empowered, to promulgate rules, instructions and regulations as may be necessary to the discharge of his duties and powers as to savings and loan associations for the supervision and regulation of said associations, and for the protection of the public investing in said savings and loan associations.

Without limiting the generality of the foregoing paragraph, rules, instructions, and regulations may be promulgated with respect to:

Reserve requirements;

Stock ownership and dividends;

Stock transfers;

Incorporators, stockholders, directors, officers and employees of an association;

Bylaws;

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-193, s. 3, effective July 1, 2001.

The structure of the office of the Commissioner of Banks;

The operation of associations;

Withdrawable accounts, bonus plans, and contracts for savings programs;

Loans and loan expenses;

Investments;

Forms and definitions;

Types of financial records to be maintained by associations;

Retention periods of various financial records;

Internal control procedures of associations;

Conduct and management of associations;

Chartering and branching;

Liquidations;

Mergers;

Conversions;

Reports which may be required by the Commissioner of Banks;

Conflicts of interest;

Collection of State savings and loan taxes;

Service corporations; and

Savings and loan holding companies.

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 144, s. 14.

Any association may cause any or all records by it to be recorded, copied or reproduced by any photographic, photostatic or miniature photographic process which correctly, accurately, permanently copies, reproduces or forms a medium for copying or reproducing the original record on a film or other durable material.

Any such photographic, photostatic or miniature photographic copy or reproduction shall be deemed to be an original record in all courts and administrative agencies for the purpose of its admissibility in evidence. A facsimile, exemplification or certified copy of any such photographic copy or reproduction shall, for all purposes, be deemed a facsimile, exemplification or certified copy of the original record.

The provisions of this section with reference to the retention and disposition of records shall apply to any federal savings and loan association operating in North Carolina unless in conflict with regulations prescribed by its supervisory authority.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1983, c. 144, s. 14; 1989, c. 76, s. 19; 2001-193, ss. 3, 16.

§ 54B-56.
Examinations by Commissioner of Banks; report.

If at any time the Commissioner of Banks deems it prudent, it shall be his duty to examine and investigate everything relating to the business of a State association or a savings and loan holding company, and to appoint a suitable and competent person to make such investigation, who shall file with the Commissioner of Banks a full report of his finding in such case, including in his report any violation of law or any unauthorized or unsafe practices of the association disclosed by his examination.

The Commissioner of Banks shall furnish a copy of the report to the association examined and may, upon request, furnish a copy of or excerpts from the report to the appropriate federal regulatory authorities.

No association may willfully delay or willfully obstruct an examination in any fashion. Any person failing to comply with this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

No person having in his possession or control any books, accounts or papers of any State association shall refuse to exhibit same to the Commissioner of Banks or his agents on demand, or shall knowingly or willingly make any false statement in regard to the same. Any person failing to comply with this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 806, s. 5; 1993, c. 539, ss. 431, 432; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-57.
Supervision and examination fees.

Every State association, including associations in process of voluntary liquidation or savings and loan holding company, shall pay into the office of the Commissioner of Banks each July a supervisory fee. Examination fees shall be paid promptly upon an association’s receipt of the examination billing. The Commissioner of Banks, subject to the advice and consent of the Commission, shall, on or before June 1 of each year:

Determine and fix the scale of supervisory and examination fees to be assessed and collected during the next fiscal year;

Determine and fix the amount of the fee and set the fee collection schedule for the fees to be assessed to and collected from applicants to defray the cost of processing their charter, branch, merger, conversion, location change, savings and loan holding company acquisition, and name change applications.

All funds and revenue collected by the Division under the provisions of this section and the provisions of all other sections of this Chapter which authorize the collection of fees and other funds shall be deposited with the State Treasurer of North Carolina and expended under the terms of the Executive Budget Act, solely to defray expenses incurred by the office of the Commissioner of Banks in carrying out its supervisory and auditing functions.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, whenever the Commissioner of Banks under the provisions of

G.S. 54B-56

appoints a suitable and competent person, other than a person employed by the Commissioner of Banks’ office, to make an examination and investigation of the business of a State association, all costs and expenses relative to such examination and investigation shall be paid by such association.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1983, c. 144, s. 15; 1985, c. 659, s. 10; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-58.
Prolonged audit, examination or revaluation; payment of costs.

If, in the opinion of the Commissioner of Banks, an examination conducted under the provisions of

G.S. 54B-57

fails to disclose the complete financial condition of an association, he may in order to ascertain its complete financial condition:

Make an extended audit or examination of the association or cause such an audit or examination to be made by an independent auditor;

Make an extended revaluation of any of the assets or liabilities of the association or cause an independent appraiser to make such revaluation.

The Commissioner of Banks shall collect from the association a reasonable sum for actual or necessary expenses of such an audit, examination or revaluation.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-59.
Cease and desist orders.

If any person or association is engaging in, or has engaged in, any unsafe or unsound practice or unfair and discriminatory practice in conducting the association’s business, or of any other law, rule, regulation, order or condition imposed in writing by the Commissioner of Banks, the Commissioner of Banks may issue a notice of charges to such person or association. A notice of charges shall specify the acts alleged to sustain a cease and desist order, and state the time and place at which a hearing shall be held. A hearing before the Commission on the charges shall be held no earlier than seven days, and no later than 14 days after issuance of the notice. The charged institution is entitled to a further extension of seven days upon filing a request with the Commissioner of Banks. The Commissioner of Banks may also issue a notice of charges if he has reasonable grounds to believe that any person or association is about to engage in any unsafe or unsound business practice, or any violation of this Chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order. If, by a preponderance of the evidence, it is shown that any person or association is engaged in, or has been engaged in, or is about to engage in, any unsafe or unsound business practice, or unfair and discriminatory practice or any violation of this Chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation, or order, a cease and desist order shall be issued. The Commission may issue a temporary cease and desist order to be effective for 14 days and may be extended once for a period of 14 days.

If any person or State association is engaging in, has engaged in, or is about to engage in any unsafe or unsound practice in conducting the association’s business, or any violation of this Chapter or of any other law, rules, regulation, order, or condition imposed in writing by the Commissioner of Banks, and the Commissioner of Banks has determined that immediate corrective action is required, the Commissioner of Banks may issue a temporary cease and desist order. A temporary cease and desist order shall be effective immediately upon issuance for a period of 14 days, and may be extended once for a period of 14 days. Such an order shall state its duration on its face and the words, “Temporary Cease and Desist Order.” A hearing before the Commission shall be held within such time as such an order remains effective, at which time a temporary order may be dissolved or made permanent.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-60.
Commissioner of Banks to have right of access to books and records of association; right to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, examine witnesses.

The Commissioner of Banks and his agents:

Shall have free access to all books and records of an association, or a service corporation thereof, that relate to its business, and the books and records kept by an officer, agent or employee relating to or upon which any record is kept;

May subpoena witnesses and administer oaths or affirmations in the examination of any director, officer, agent, or employee of an association, or a service corporation thereof or of any other person in relation to its affairs, transactions and conditions;

May require the production of records, books, papers, contracts and other documents; and

May order that improper entries be corrected on the books and records of an association.

The Commissioner of Banks may issue subpoenas duces tecum.

If a person fails to comply with a subpoena so issued or a party or witness refuses to testify on any matters, a court of competent jurisdiction, on the application of the Commissioner of Banks, shall compel compliance by proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from such court or a refusal to testify in such court.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-61.
Test appraisals of collateral for loans; expense paid.

The Commissioner of Banks may direct the making of test appraisals of real estate and other collateral securing loans made by associations doing business in this State, employ competent appraisers, or prescribe a list from which competent appraisers may be selected, for the making of such appraisals by the Commissioner of Banks, and do any and all other acts incident to the making of such test appraisals.

In lieu of causing such appraisals to be made, the Commissioner of Banks may accept an appraisal caused to be made by the appropriate federal regulatory authority.

The expense and cost of test appraisals made pursuant to this section shall be defrayed by the association subjected to such test appraisals, and each association doing business in this State shall pay all reasonable costs and expenses of such test appraisals when it shall be directed.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 806, s. 6; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-62.
Relationship of savings and loan associations with the Savings Institutions Division.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, a savings and loan association or any director, officer, employee, or representative thereof shall not grant or give to any employee of the Savings Institutions Division, or to their spouses, any loan or gratuity, directly or indirectly.

No person on the staff of the Savings Institutions Division shall:

Hold an office or position in any State association or exercise any right to vote on any State association matter by reason of being a member of the association;

Be interested, directly or indirectly in any savings and loan association organized under the laws of this State; or

Undertake any indebtedness, as a borrower directly or indirectly or endorser, surety or guarantor, or sell or otherwise dispose of any loan or investment to any savings and loan association organized under the laws of this State.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, any person employed in or by the Savings Institutions Division may be a withdrawable account holder and receive earnings on such account.

Any employee of the Savings Institutions Division shall dispose of any right or interest in a savings and loan association, held either directly or indirectly, that is prohibited under subsection (b) of this section, within 60 days after the date of the employee’s appointment or employment. If that person is indebted as borrower directly or indirectly, or is an endorser, surety or guarantor on a note, at the time of his appointment or employment, he may continue in such capacity until such loan is paid off.

If any employee of the Division has a loan or other note acquired by a State savings and loan association through the secondary market, he may continue with the debt until such loan or note is paid off.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1989, c. 76, s. 20; 1991, c. 707, s. 3; 2001-193, s. 6.

§ 54B-63.
Confidential information.

The following records or information of the Commission, the Commissioner of Banks or the agent(s) of either shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed:

Information obtained or compiled in preparation of or anticipation of, or during an examination, audit or investigation of any association;

Information reflecting the specific collateral given by a named borrower, the specific amount of stock owned by a named stockholder, or specific withdrawable accounts held by a named member or customer;

Information obtained, prepared or compiled during or as a result of an examination, audit or investigation of any association by an agency of the United States, if the records would be confidential under federal law or regulation;

Information and reports submitted by associations to federal regulatory agencies, if the records or information would be confidential under federal law or regulation;

Information and records regarding complaints from the public received by the Division which concern associations when the complaint would or could result in an investigation, except to the management of those associations;

Any other letters, reports, memoranda, recordings, charts or other documents or records which would disclose any information of which disclosure is prohibited in this subsection.

A court of competent jurisdiction may order the disclosure of specific information.

The information contained in an application shall be deemed to be public information. Disclosure shall not extend to the financial statement of the incorporators nor to any further information deemed by the Commissioner of Banks to be confidential.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the exchange of information relating to associations and the business thereof with the representatives of the agencies of this State, other states, or of the United States, or with reserve or insuring agencies for associations. The private business and affairs of an individual or company shall not be disclosed by any person employed by the Savings Institutions Division, any member of the Commission, or by any person with whom information is exchanged under the authority of this subsection.

Any official or employee violating this section shall be liable to any person injured by disclosure of such confidential information for all damages sustained thereby. Penalties provided shall not be exclusive of other penalties.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1989, c. 76, s. 21; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-63.1.
Confidential records.

As used in this section:

“Compliance review committee” means:

An audit, loan review, or compliance committee appointed by the board of directors of an association or any other person to the extent the person acts at the direction of or reports to a compliance review committee; and

Whose functions are to audit, evaluate, report, or determine compliance with any of the following:

Loan underwriting standards;

Asset quality;

Financial reporting to federal or State regulatory agencies;

Adherence to the association’s investment, lending, accounting, ethical, and financial standards; or

Compliance with federal or State statutory requirements.

“Compliance review documents” means documents prepared for or created by a compliance review committee.

“Loan review committee” means a person or group of persons who, on behalf of an association, reviews assets, including loans held by the association, for the purpose of assessing the credit quality of the loans or the loan application process, compliance with the association’s investment and loan policies, and compliance with applicable laws and regulations.

“Person” means an individual, group of individuals, board, committee, partnership, firm, association, corporation, or other entity.

Associations chartered under the laws of North Carolina or of the United States shall maintain complete records of compliance review documents, and the documents shall be available for examination by any federal or State association regulatory agency having supervisory jurisdiction. Notwithstanding Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, compliance review documents in the custody of an association or regulatory agency are confidential, are not open for public inspection, and are not discoverable or admissible in evidence in a civil action against an association, its directors, officers, or employees, unless the court finds that the interests of justice require that the documents be discoverable or admissible in evidence.

History.

1995, c. 408, s. 2.

§ 54B-64.
Civil penalties; State associations.

Except as otherwise provided in this Article, any association which is found to have violated any provision of this Article may be ordered to forfeit and pay a civil penalty of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). Any association which is found to have violated or failed to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this Article may be ordered to forfeit or pay a civil penalty of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for each day that the violation or failure to comply continues.The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the Commissioner of Banks is authorized to assess such a penalty and to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to move the court to order payment of the penalty. Prior to the assessment of the penalty, a hearing shall be held by the Commissioner of Banks which shall comply with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

If the Commissioner of Banks determines that, as a result of a violation of any provision of this Article, or of a failure to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this Article, a situation exists requiring immediate corrective action, the Commissioner of Banks may impose the civil penalty in this section on the association without a prior hearing, and said penalty shall be effective as of the date of notice to the association. Imposition of such penalty may be directly appealed to the Wake County Superior Court.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone damaged by a State association from bringing a separate cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 36; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-65.
Civil penalties; directors, officers and employees.

Any person, whether a director, officer or employee, who is found to have violated any provision of this Article, whether willfully or as a result of gross negligence, gross incompetency, or recklessness, may be ordered to forfeit and pay a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation. Any person who is found to have violated or failed to comply with any cease and desist order issued under the authority of this Article, may be ordered to forfeit and pay a civil penalty of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation for each day that the violation or failure to comply continues.The clear proceeds of civil penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

To enforce the provisions of this section, the Commissioner of Banks is authorized to assess such a penalty and to appear in a court of competent jurisdiction and to move the court to order payment of the penalty. Prior to the assessment of the penalty, a hearing shall be held by the Commissioner of Banks which shall comply with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Whenever the Commissioner of Banks shall determine that an emergency exists which requires immediate corrective action, the Commissioner of Banks, either before or after instituting any other action or proceeding authorized by this Article, may request the Attorney General to institute a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction, in the name of the State upon the relation of the Commissioner of Banks seeking injunctive relief to restrain or enjoin the violation or threatened violation of this Article and for such other and further relief as the court may deem proper. Instituting an action for injunctive relief shall not relieve any party to such proceedings from any civil or criminal penalty prescribed for violation of this Article.

Nothing in this section shall prevent anyone damaged by a director, officer or employee of a State association from bringing a separate cause of action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1998-215, s. 37; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-66.
Criminal penalties.

The provisions of this section shall in no event extend to persons who are found to have acted only with gross negligence, simple negligence, recklessness or incompetence.

In addition to any of the other penalties or remedies provided by this Article, the following shall be deemed to be Class 1 misdemeanors:

The willful or knowing violation of the provisions of this Article by any employee of the Savings Institutions Division.

The willful or knowing violation of a cease and desist order which has become final in that no further administrative or judicial appeal is available.

In addition to any of the other penalties or remedies provided by this Article, the willful omission, making, or concurrence in making or publishing a written report, exhibit, or entry in a financial statement on the books of the association, which contains a material statement known to be false shall be deemed to be a Class 1 misdemeanor. For purposes of this section, “material” shall mean “so substantial and important as to influence a reasonable and prudent businessman or investor.”

The Commissioner of Banks is authorized to enforce this section in a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1989, c. 76, s. 22; 1993, c. 539, s. 433; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-67.
Primary jurisdiction.

Whenever an agency of the United States government shall defer to the Commissioner of Banks, or notify the Commissioner of Banks of pending action against an association chartered by this State or fail to exercise its authority over any State- or federally-chartered association doing business in this State, the Commissioner of Banks shall have the authority to exercise jurisdiction over such association.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-68.
Supervisory control.

Whenever the Commissioner of Banks determines that an association is conducting its business in an unsafe or unsound manner or in any fashion which threatens the financial integrity or sound operation of the association, the Commissioner of Banks may serve a notice of charges on the association, requiring it to show cause why it should not be placed under supervisory control. Such notice of charges shall specify the grounds for supervisory control, and set the time and place for a hearing. A hearing before the Commission pursuant to such notice shall be held within 15 days after issuance of the notice of charges, and shall comply with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

If, after the hearing provided above, Commission determines that supervisory control of the association is necessary to protect the association’s members, customers, stockholders or creditors, or the general public, the Commissioner of Banks shall issue an order taking supervisory control of the association. An appeal may be filed in the Wake County Superior Court.

If the order taking supervisory control becomes final, the Commissioner of Banks may appoint an agent to supervise and monitor the operations of the association during the period of supervisory control. During the period of supervisory control, the association shall act in accordance with such instructions and directions as may be given by the Commissioner of Banks directly or through his supervisory agent and shall not act or fail to act except when to do so would violate an outstanding cease and desist order.

Within 180 days of the date the order taking supervisory control becomes final, the Commissioner of Banks shall issue an order approving a plan for the termination of supervisory control. The plan may provide for:

The issuance by the association of capital stock;

The appointment of one or more officers and/or directors;

The reorganization, merger, or consolidation of the association;

The dissolution and liquidation of the association.

The order approving the plan shall not take effect for 30 days during which time period an appeal may be filed in the Wake County Superior Court.

The costs incident to this proceeding shall be paid by the association, provided such costs are found to be reasonable.

For the purposes of this section, an order shall be deemed final if:

No appeal is filed within the specific time allowed for the appeal, or

After all judicial appeals are exhausted.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.

§ 54B-69.
Removal of directors, officers and employees.

If, in the Commissioner of Banks’ opinion, one or more directors, officers or employees of any association has participated in or consented to any violation of this Chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order, or any unsafe or unsound business practice in the operation of any association; or any insider loan not specifically authorized by or pursuant to this Chapter; or any repeated violation of or failure to comply with any association’s bylaws, the Commissioner of Banks may serve a written notice of charges upon the director, officer or employee in question, and the association, stating his intent to remove said director, officer or employee. Such notice shall specify the conduct and place for the hearing before the Commission to be held. A hearing shall be held no earlier than 15 days and no later than 30 days after the notice of charges is served, and it shall comply with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. If, after the hearing, the Commission determines that the charges asserted have been proven by a preponderance of the evidence, the Commissioner of Banks may issue an order removing the director, officer or employee in question. Such an order shall be effective upon issuance and may include the entire board of directors or all of the officers of the association.

If it is determined that any director, officer or employee of any association has knowingly participated in or consented to any violation of this Chapter, or any other law, rule, regulation or order, or engaged in any unsafe or unsound business practice in the operation of any association, or any repeated violation of or failure to comply with any association’s bylaws, and that as a result, a situation exists requiring immediate corrective action, the Commissioner of Banks may issue an order temporarily removing such person or persons pending a hearing. Such an order shall state its duration on its face and the words, “Temporary Order of Removal,” and shall be effective upon issuance, for a period of 15 days, and may be extended once for a period of 15 days. A hearing must be held within 10 days of the expiration of a temporary order, or any extension thereof, at which time a temporary order may be dissolved or converted to a permanent order.

Any removal pursuant to subsections (a) or (b) of this section shall be effective in all respects as if such removal had been made by the board of directors, the members or the stockholders of the association in question.

Without the prior written approval of the Commissioner of Banks, no director, officer or employee permanently removed pursuant to this section shall be eligible to be elected, reelected or appointed to any position as a director, officer or employee of that association, nor shall such a director, officer or employee be eligible to be elected to or retain a position as a director, officer or employee of any other State association.

History.

1981, c. 282, s. 3; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 2001-193, s. 16.